Maine, session 132, LD415.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
Statewide Hunger Relief Program Z288
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding to contract with nonprofit organizations that provide
statewide hunger relief services.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $1,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $1,000,000